District of Columbia statutes.
9-206.02

Authority to issue rules.

The Mayor may issue rules necessary to implement and enforce this chapter.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 602, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-472.